Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2411
Vacated town sites; payment of original amount of taxes; penalties remitted.

Whenever town sites have been located, surveyed, and laid out in this state, under any law of the State of Nebraska, or under any law of the United States, and such town site or any part thereof has been vacated or abandoned as such, all taxes levied on the lots or subdivision therein vacated may be liquidated by payment of the original amount of such taxes without interest or penalties.

Laws 1889, c. 77, § 1, p. 538;

R.S.1913, § 6685;

C.S.1922, § 6222;

C.S.1929, § 77-2611.